Idaho, session 2026, H0921.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education for the
Student Services Program the following amounts to be expended according to
the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
School Bus Camera
Fund $28,200 $28,200
American Rescue Plan
Fund $50,000 $16,600 203,000 269,600
Federal Grant
Fund 19,400 200,600 0 220,000
TOTAL $69,400 $217,200 $231,200 $517,800
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.